tests/models/toy_nouns.lexc
! Toy noun analyzer fixture: regular +Sg/+Pl with a multichar-symbol tagset.
! Built (and inverted to surface->analysis) by build_fixtures.py.
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root
  Nouns ;

LEXICON Nouns
  cat:cat   Infl ;
  dog:dog   Infl ;

LEXICON Infl
  +N+Sg:0   # ;
  +N+Pl:s   # ;
